Louisiana, session 2026, SB267.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1508(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1508. Initial notification
* * *
C.(1) No insurer shall use a consumer's credit information in
underwriting or rating a consumer for automobile insurance.
(2) No insurer shall use a single United States Postal Service zip code or
a combination of zip codes in underwriting or rating a consumer for automobile
insurance.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-558 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 267